Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,121
Parolee; legal custody of Board of Parole; action of board.

A committed offender while on parole shall remain in the legal custody and control of the Board of Parole. The board may at any time revoke the parole of an offender or recommit him or her to the custody of the Department of Correctional Services, with or without cause.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 52, p. 3100;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 47.

The Nebraska Board of Parole retained custody over a parolee and was empowered to revoke his parole for violating parole condition barring him from using social media. Tyrrell v. Frakes, 309 Neb. 85, 958 N.W.2d 673 (2021).

Constitutional due process does not require the Board of Parole to conduct an adversary hearing to revoke parole nor does it require appointment of counsel for indigent parolees nor compulsory process. Brown v. Sigler, 186 Neb. 800, 186 N.W.2d 735 (1971).